transducers/ckt_full/noun.lexd
PATTERNS
N-Deriv? N K?

LEXICON K
<part>:>э
<part>:>{ы}ӈэ
<emph>:>ъым    #!!! FIXME
<clitic>:>{ы}рээн

PATTERN AnimCase
[<aa><ess>:>{ы}н]
[<aa><pl><abs>:>{ы}нти]
[<aa><sg><erg><def>:>{ы}н{Æ}]
[<aa><pl><erg><def>:>{ы}рык]
[<aa><sg><loc><def>:>{ы}н{Æ}]
[<aa><pl><loc><def>:>{ы}рык]
[<aa><pl><all><def>:>{ы}рыкы{⁺ⱽᴴ}]
[<aa><all><def>:>{ы}на]
[<aa>:>{ы}р] OblCase

LEXICON Obl[obl,Ia,Ib,Ic,III,IV,SINGlg,SINGlyng]
:
LEXICON Obl[obl,Vv,Vvy]
:в
LEXICON Obl[obl,NEG]
:>ин{Æ}

LEXICON NonOblCase[nonobl]
<sg><abs>[Ia,Vv,abs]:[Ia,Vv,abs]
<sg><abs>[Ib]:{°}[Ib]
<sg><abs>[Ic]:{·}[Ic]
<sg><abs>[III]:>{ы}н[III]
<sg><abs>[IV]:>{ы}ӈы[IV]
<sg><abs>[Vvy]:ы[Vvy]
<sg><abs>[NEG]:>ин[NEG]
<sing><abs>[SINGlg]:>{ы}ԓгын{⁺ⱽᴴ}[SINGlg]
<sing><abs>[SINGlyng]:>{ы}ԓыӈын{⁺ⱽᴴ}[SINGlyng]

LEXICON OblCase[obl,Ia,Ib,Ic,III,IV,SINGlg,SINGlyng,Vv,Vvy,NEG]
<pl><abs>:>{ы}т{и}
<erg>:>{T}{Æ}
<ess>:>у
<loc>:>{ы}к
<all>:>{G}ты{⁺ⱽᴴ}
<abl>:>{G}{ы}пы{⁺ⱽᴴ}
<ori>:>{ы}гйит
<ine>:>{ы}чыку
<per>:>{ы}еквэ{⁺ⱽᴴ}
<sub>:>{ы}йиӈкы

LEXICON Poss[Ia]
# different possessed, mark on the possessor
<poss><1sg>:>ин{Æ}гым
<poss><2sg>:>ин{Æ}гыт
<poss><1pl>:>ин{Æ}мури
<poss><2pl>:>ин{Æ}тури
<poss><3pl>:>ин{Æ}т{и}
<pl><poss><1sg>:>{ы}ргин{Æ}гым
<pl><poss><2sg>:>{ы}ргин{Æ}гыт
<pl><poss><3sg>:>{ы}ргин
<pl><poss><1pl>:>{ы}ргин{Æ}мури
<pl><poss><2pl>:>{ы}ргин{Æ}тури
<pl><poss><3pl>:>{ы}ргин{Æ}т{и}

LEXICON Poss[Ic]
<poss><3sg>:>ин{Æ}

# different possessors, mark on the possessed
LEXICON Poss[abs]
<px1sg><abs>:>{ы}гым
<px2sg><abs>:>{ы}гыт
<px3sg><abs>:>{ы}н
<px1pl><abs>:>{ы}мури
<px2pl><abs>:>{ы}тури
<px3pl><abs>:>{ы}т{и}

LEXICON Rel[Ia]
<rel>:>{ы}кин

LEXICON AccCase(3)
<com>    г{Æ}>  >{T}{Æ}
<assoc>  га>    >{ы}ма{⁺ⱽᴴ}
<prv>    {Æ}>   >{ы}к{Æ}

LEXICON N-Deriv
<f>:ӈ{Æ}в{ы}>
#<ints>:ԓ{ы}ги>
#<ints2>:т{Æ}>
<restr>:{Æ}м>
<approx>:м{Æ}ԓ>
<approx>:м{Æ}ч>
<auth>:ԓ{ы}ги>

PATTERN Case
Obl OblCase|AnimCase
NonOblCase

PATTERN DerivedNouns
Nouns Deriv-N?

LEXICON Nominaliser[Ia]
<nmzr>:>{ы}ԓӄыԓ

LEXICON Nominaliser[III]
<nmzr>:>{ы}чь
<nmzr>:>{ы}ёԓг

PATTERN Deriv-N
Poss
Rel

PATTERN Derived-N
Nouns
DerivableVerbStem[-iv] [<pass>[Ia]:>{ы}ё{T}[Ia]]
DerivableVerbStem[-tv] [<act>[III]:>{ы}ԓь[III]]
DerivableVerbStem[-tv] [<act><neg>[Ia]:>{T}{Æ}>{ы}ԓь[Ia]]
DerivableVerbStem[-tv] [<act><neg>[NEG]:>{ы}к{Æ}>{ы}ԓь[NEG]]
DerivableVerbStem      SimpleGerund | ( [<ger>:] Deriv-N )

LEXICON SimpleGerund
<ger>[Ia]:>{ы}ԓӄыԓ[Ia]
<ger><act>[III]:>{ы}гырг{⁺ⱽᴴ}[III]
<ger><loc>[Vv]:>{ы}н{⁺ⱽᴴ}[Vv]
<ger><age>[III]:>{ы}я[III]
<ger><ins>[Ic]:>{и}н{Æ}ӈ{Æ}[Ic]
<ger><cnt>[III]:>{ы}ёԓг[III]

PATTERN N
Derived-N[Ia]       Case[Ia]
Derived-N[Ib]       Case[Ib]
Derived-N[Ic]       Case[Ic]
Nouns Poss[Ic]      Case[Ic]
Nouns Poss[abs]     NonOblCase[abs]
Derived-N[III]      Case[III]
Derived-N[IV]       Case[IV]
Derived-N[Vv]       Case[Vv]
Derived-N[Vvy]      Case[Vvy]
#Derived-N[NEG]      Case[NEG]
Derived-N[SINGlg]   Case[SINGlg]
Derived-N[SINGlyng] Case[SINGlyng]
Derived-N[abs]      NonOblCase[abs]
Derived-N[obl]      Obl[-Vv,-Vy] OblCase
:AccCase(2) Derived-N[-abs] AccCase(1):AccCase(3)
